Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 509.8 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Beginning November 1, 2026, elected state officials shall have
the right to access all facilities operated by the Department of
Corrections without prior notification to the Department of
Corrections. The Department shall implement the necessary security
protocols to manage said visits without compromising the safety and
security of the facility, its inmates, correctional officers, and
employees of the Department.
Req. No. 14799 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14799 GRS 12/19/25





















Req. No. 14799 Page 2